Vermont, session 2025-2026, S315.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 3802 is amended to read:
§ 3802. PROPERTY TAX
The following property shall be exempt from taxation:
* * *
(23) A homestead validly declared under section 5410 of this title shall
be exempt from the homestead education property tax imposed pursuant to
VT LEG #385924 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.315
2026 Page 2 of 3
chapter 135 of this title if the declarant for the homestead meets both of the
following conditions:
(A) the declarant is 65 years of age or older as of December 31 of the
taxable year; and
(B) the declarant has been domiciled in Vermont for at least 10
consecutive years.
Sec. 2. TRANSITION; HOMESTEAD PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION FOR
LONG-TERM RESIDENTS WHO ARE 65 YEARS OF AGE OR
OLDER; FYS 2027–2029
(a) Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 3802(23) and 32 V.S.A. chapter 135, for
fiscal years 2027–2029, the only education property tax imposed on a
homestead property validly declared under 32 V.S.A. § 5410 shall be as
calculated under this section if the declarant for the homestead property meets
both of the following conditions:
(1) the declarant is 65 years of age or older as of December 31 of the
taxable year; and
(2) the declarant has been domiciled in Vermont for at least 10
consecutive years.
(b) The legislative body for the municipality in which the homestead is
located shall bill the declarant at the homestead rate determined for the
municipality pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 5402(b)(1) for the fiscal year multiplied
VT LEG #385924 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.315
2026 Page 3 of 3
by the following portion of the education property tax grand list value of the
homestead:
(1) for fiscal year 2027, 75 percent;
(2) for fiscal year 2028, 50 percent; and
(3) for fiscal year 2029, 25 percent.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385924 v.4